Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND 2 Section 1. REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ 3 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 4 infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 to the following 5 departments and agencies for the fiscal year beginning July 6 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 7 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 8 designated: 9 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 10 a. For the demolition of the fleet building located at 307 11 East Seventh Street, Des Moines, Iowa, notwithstanding section 12 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 14 b. For maintenance projects at the state historical 15 building: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 17 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 18 a. (1) For deposit in the water quality initiative fund 19 created in section 466B.45 for purposes of supporting the 20 water quality initiative administered by the division of soil 21 conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , 22 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 23 purposes, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph 24 âcâ: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,200,000 26 (2) (a) The moneys appropriated in this lettered 27 paragraph shall be used to support demonstration projects in 28 subwatersheds as designated by the department that are part 29 of high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources 30 coordinating council. 31 (b) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 32 shall be used to support demonstration projects in watersheds 33 generally, including regional watersheds, as designated by the 34 division, and high-priority watersheds identified by the water 35 -1- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 1/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ resources coordinating council. 1 (3) In supporting projects in watersheds and subwatersheds 2 as provided in subparagraph (2), all of the following apply: 3 (a) The demonstration projects must utilize water quality 4 practices as described in the latest revision of the document 5 entitled âIowa Nutrient Reduction Strategyâ initially presented 6 in November 2012 by the department of agriculture and land 7 stewardship, the department of natural resources, and Iowa 8 state university of science and technology. 9 (b) The division shall implement demonstration projects 10 as provided in subparagraph division (a) by providing 11 for participation by persons who hold a legal interest in 12 agricultural land used in farming. To every extent practical, 13 the division shall provide for collaborative participation by 14 such persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land 15 located within the same subwatershed. 16 (c) The division shall implement demonstration projects on 17 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. Except for 18 edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the amount shall 19 not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of establishing the 20 practice as determined by the division or 50 percent of the 21 actual cost of establishing the practice, whichever is less. 22 (d) The demonstration projects shall be used to educate 23 other persons about the feasibility and value of establishing 24 similar water quality practices. The division shall promote 25 field day events for purposes of allowing interested persons to 26 establish water quality practices on such personsâ agricultural 27 land. 28 (e) The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 29 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 30 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 31 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 32 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 33 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 34 land shall be a confidential record. 35 -2- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 2/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ (4) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 1 shall be used to support education and outreach in a manner 2 that encourages persons who hold a legal interest in 3 agricultural land used for farming to implement water quality 4 practices, including the establishment of such practices in 5 watersheds generally, and not limited to subwatersheds or 6 high-priority watersheds. 7 (5) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 8 may be used to contract with persons to coordinate the 9 implementation of efforts provided in this lettered paragraph. 10 (6) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 11 may be used by the department to support urban soil and water 12 conservation efforts, which may include but are not limited 13 to management practices related to bioretention, landscaping, 14 the use of permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality 15 restoration. The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share 16 basis as provided in chapter 161A . 17 (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 18 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in this 19 lettered paragraph to carry out the provisions of this lettered 20 paragraph on a cost-share basis in combination with other 21 moneys available to the department from a state or federal 22 source. 23 (8) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 24 this lettered paragraph may be used for costs of administration 25 and implementation of the water quality initiative administered 26 by the division. 27 b. For deposit in the renewable fuels infrastructure fund 28 created in section 159A.16 for renewable fuel infrastructure 29 programs: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 31 c. For updating the maximum return to nitrogen modeling 32 system for fertilizer management, notwithstanding section 8.57, 33 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 35 -3- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 3/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Any information received, collected, or held for purposes 1 of this lettered paragraph is a confidential record exempt 2 from public release if the information identifies a person 3 who holds a legal interest in agricultural land or who has 4 previously held a legal interest in agricultural land, a person 5 who is involved or who was previously involved in managing 6 the agricultural land or producing crops or livestock on 7 the agricultural land, or the identifiable location of the 8 agricultural land. 9 3. DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 10 For building repairs for the building located at 524 Fourth 11 Street, Des Moines, Iowa: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 559,000 13 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 14 For the renovation and construction of a central office for 15 community-based corrections located in district 4: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,163,847 17 5. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 18 a. For deposit in the community attraction and tourism 19 fund created in section 15F.204, notwithstanding section 8.57, 20 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 22 b. For deposit in the destination Iowa fund created in 23 section 15.281, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 24 paragraph âcâ: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 26 c. For grants to nonprofit organizations committed to 27 strengthening communities through youth development, healthy 28 living, and social responsibility for costs associated with 29 the renovation and maintenance of facility infrastructure at 30 facilities located in cities with a population of less than 31 28,000 as determined by the 2020 federal decennial census: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 33 d. For providing a grant to the entity in possession of 34 the U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) for purposes of deck replacement, 35 -4- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 4/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 2 6. IOWA COMMUNICATIONS NETWORK 3 For the construction of a network redundancy at the joint 4 forces headquarters, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 5 3, paragraph âcâ: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 7 7. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY 8 For the construction of a driving training facility: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,000,000 10 8. IOWA STATE FAIR AUTHORITY 11 For the construction of an agriculture education facility: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 13 9. JUDICIAL BRANCH 14 For the renovation of the Linn county courthouse, and 15 for furnishing the courthouse, notwithstanding section 8.57, 16 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 229,000 18 10. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 19 a. For implementation of lake projects that have 20 established watershed improvement initiatives and community 21 support in accordance with the departmentâs annual lake 22 restoration plan and report, notwithstanding section 8.57, 23 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,600,000 25 b. For state park infrastructure improvements: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 27 c. For water trails and low head dam safety grants, 28 including grants for projects relating to eligible water 29 bodies, as defined in section 456A.33C, notwithstanding section 30 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 32 d. For grants to communities or organizations for tree 33 planting projects through the community forestry grant program, 34 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 35 -5- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 5/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 1 e. For providing funding assistance to eligible 2 communities, as described in section 455E.11, subsection 2, 3 paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), 4 to address abandoned buildings by promoting waste abatement, 5 diversion, selective dismantlement of building components, 6 and recycling, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 7 paragraph âcâ: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 800,000 9 11. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 10 a. For major maintenance projects at national guard 11 armories and facilities: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 13 b. For improvement projects for Iowa national guard 14 installations and readiness centers to support operations and 15 training requirements: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 17 c. For construction improvement projects at the Camp Dodge 18 facility: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 550,000 20 d. The department of public defense shall report to the 21 general assembly by December 15, 2025, regarding the projects 22 the department has funded or intends to fund from moneys 23 appropriated to the department pursuant to this subsection. 24 12. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 25 a. For payments and other costs due under a financing 26 agreement entered into by the treasurer of state for building 27 the statewide interoperable communications system pursuant to 28 section 29C.23, subsection 2, notwithstanding section 8.57, 29 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,486,177 31 b. For deposit in the public safety equipment fund created 32 in section 80.48, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 33 paragraph âcâ: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 35 -6- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 6/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 13. BOARD OF REGENTS 1 a. For allocation by the state board of regents to the 2 state university of Iowa, Iowa state university of science 3 and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to 4 reimburse the institutions for deficiencies in the operating 5 funds resulting from the pledging of tuition, student fees 6 and charges, and institutional income to finance the cost of 7 providing academic and administrative buildings and facilities 8 and utility services at the institutions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,600,000 10 b. For the renovation and construction of the public policy 11 center at the commons at the university of northern Iowa: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,720,000 13 14. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 14 a. For acquiring, constructing, and improving recreational 15 trails within the state: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 17 b. For deposit in the public transit infrastructure grant 18 fund created in section 324A.6A, for projects that meet 19 the definition of vertical infrastructure in section 8.57, 20 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 22 c. For deposit in the railroad revolving loan and grant 23 fund created in section 327H.20A, notwithstanding section 8.57, 24 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 26 d. For vertical infrastructure improvements at the 27 commercial service airports within the state: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,900,000 29 e. For vertical infrastructure improvements at general 30 aviation airports within the state: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 32 15. TREASURER OF STATE 33 For distribution in accordance with chapter 174 to qualified 34 fairs that belong to the association of Iowa fairs for county 35 -7- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 7/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ fair vertical infrastructure improvements: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,060,000 2 Sec. 2. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 3 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 4 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 5 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 6 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 7 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 8 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 9 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 10 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 11 the close of that same fiscal year. 12 DIVISION II 13 TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND 14 Sec. 3. TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND. There is 15 appropriated from the technology reinvestment fund created in 16 section 8.57C to the following departments and agencies for the 17 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 18 the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to 19 be used for the purposes designated: 20 1. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 21 For technology projects and upgrades: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,013,466 23 2. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 24 For the purchase of an enterprise management system: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,375,000 26 3. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 27 a. For the continued development and implementation of an 28 educational data warehouse that will be utilized by teachers, 29 parents, school district administrators, area education agency 30 staff, department of education staff, and policymakers: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 32 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, the 33 department may use a portion for an e-transcript data system 34 capable of tracking students throughout the studentsâ education 35 -8- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 8/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ via interconnectivity with multiple schools. 1 b. For maintenance and lease costs associated with 2 connections for part III of the Iowa communications network: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,727,000 4 4. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT 5 For the continued implementation of a statewide mass 6 notification and emergency messaging system: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 8 5. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT 9 a. For the continued development and implementation of 10 a searchable database that can be placed on the internet for 11 budget and financial information: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 13 b. For the continued development and implementation of the 14 comprehensive electronic grant management system: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 70,000 16 c. For the upgrade of the local government budget and 17 property tax system: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 19 d. For the annual licensing of a searchable database that is 20 placed on the internet for budget and financial information: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 358,429 22 e. For the security office of the chief information 23 officer, including for statewide endpoint detection and 24 response, cybersecurity incident investigation response, and 25 miscellaneous purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,947,658 27 f. For the cost of equipment and computer software for the 28 continued development and implementation of Iowaâs criminal 29 justice information system: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,400,000 31 g. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data 32 warehouse: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 282,664 34 h. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data 35 -9- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 9/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ warehouse transition: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 290,000 2 6. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 3 For the purchase of software relating to state active-duty 4 tracking and for data conversion costs associated with 5 migrating technology platforms: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220,000 7 7. TREASURER OF STATE 8 a. For the purchase of software relating to investment 9 tracking: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 192,000 11 b. For the purchase of software relating to banking 12 reconciliations: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 228,000 14 Sec. 4. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 15 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 16 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 17 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 18 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 19 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 20 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 21 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 22 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 23 the close of that same fiscal year. 24 Sec. 5. Section 8.57C, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 27 state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal year 28 beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and for each subsequent fiscal 29 year thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred 30 thousand dollars. 31 b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 32 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 33 2023 2025 , and ending June 30, 2024 2026 , the sum of eighteen 34 million three hundred ninety thousand two hundred ninety 35 -10- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 10/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ eighteen million two hundred sixty-nine thousand two hundred 1 seventeen dollars to the technology reinvestment fund, 2 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 3 c. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 4 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, 5 and ending June 30, 2025, the sum of twenty-one million one 6 hundred thirty-one thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars 7 to the technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section 8 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 9 DIVISION III 10 CHANGES TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS 11 Sec. 6. 2021 Iowa Acts, chapter 167, section 2, as amended 12 by 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 118, section 6, and 2024 Iowa Acts, 13 chapter 1155, section 7, is amended to read as follows: 14 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 15 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, for purposes 16 of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided otherwise, 17 unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made 18 in this division of this Act shall not revert but shall remain 19 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 20 close of the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of 21 the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 22 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 23 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 24 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 25 fiscal year. 26 2. a. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 27 provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from 28 an appropriation made in section 1, subsection 10, paragraph 29 âdâ, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as amended by 2022 30 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 11 , shall not revert but shall 31 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 32 until the project for which the appropriation was made is 33 completed. 34 b. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 35 -11- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 11/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 1 subsection 4, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, shall 2 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 3 purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 4 ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for 5 which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which 6 the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 7 c. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 8 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 9 subsection 16, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as 10 amended by this 2024 Iowa Act, shall not revert but shall 11 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 12 until the close of the fiscal year that ends three years after 13 the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, 14 or until the project for which the appropriation was made is 15 completed, whichever is earlier. 16 Sec. 7. 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 2, as amended 17 by 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 9, is amended to read 18 as follows: 19 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 20 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 21 provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or 22 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division 23 of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for 24 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 25 the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the 26 fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 27 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 28 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 29 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 30 fiscal year. 31 2. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 32 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 33 subsection 4, of this division of this 2022 Iowa Act, shall 34 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 35 -12- LSB 1017XG (7) 91 th/ns 12/ 14 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 1 ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for 2 which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which 3 the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 4 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 5 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 6